Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-544
Professional development requirements; rules and regulations.

Every two years a registered abstracter shall complete and certify to the board that he or she has successfully completed three hours of board-approved professional development credits. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the effective delivery and approval of all programs of professional development required.

Laws 1981, LB 409, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-532;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 14;

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 57.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).